espeak-data/dictsource/ip_rules
//Replace small caps with regular capitals to make things less confusing
.replace ʙ B
.replace ɢ G
.replace ɡ g
.replace ʜ H
.replace ɪ I
.replace ʟ L
.replace ɴ N
.replace ʀ R
.replace ʏ Y

      //****\\
     //Vowels\\
    //********\\

.group  a
        a   a

.group  ɐ
        ɐ   6

.group  ɑ
        ɑ   A

.group  ɒ
        ɒ   Q

.group  æ
        æ   {

.group  e
        e   e

.group  ə
        ə   @

.group  ɘ
        ɘ   @\

.group  ɛ
        ɛ   E

.group  ɜ
        ɜ   3

.group  ɤ
        ɤ   7

.group  i
        i   i
        
.group  ɨ
        ɨ   1
        
.group  I
        I   I

.group  o
        o   o

.group  ɵ
        ɵ   8

.group  ø
        ø   2

.group  œ
        œ   9

.group  ɶ
        ɶ   &

.group  ɔ
        ɔ   0

.group  u
        u   u

.group  ʉ
        ʉ   }

.group  ʊ
        ʊ   U

.group  ʌ
        ʌ   V

.group  y
        y   y


      //********\\
     //Consonants\\
    //************\\

.group  b
        b   b

//MISSING: voiced bilabial implosive ɓ
//MISSING: voiced bilabial trill ʙ

.group  c
        c   c

//MISSING: voiceless palatal implosive ƈ

.group  ç
        ç   C

.group  ɕ
        ɕ   s\

.group  d
        d   d
        dz  dz

.group  ɖ
        ɖ   d'

.group  ð
        ð   D

.group  f
        f   f

.group  g
        g   g

//MISSING: voiced velar implosive ɠ

//.group  G
//        G   G\
//MISSING: voiced uvular plosive ɢ

//MISSING: voice uvular implosive ʛ

.group  ɣ
        ɣ   G

.group  h
        h   h

//MISSING: voiceless pharyngeal fricative ħ

//MISSING: voiced glottal fricative ɦ

//MISSING: voiced labial-palatal approximant ɥ

//MISSING: voiceless epiglotaal fricative ʜ

.group  j
        j   j

.group  ʝ
        ʝ   j\

.group  ɟ
        ɟ   J\

//MISSING: voiced palatal implosive ʄ

.group  k
        k   k
        kʰ  k_h

//MISSING: voiceless velar implosive ƙ

.group  l
        l   l

//MISSING: velarised voiced dental or alveolar approximant ɫ

.group  ɭ
        ɭ   L'

.group  L
        L   L\

//MISSING: voiced alveolar lateral fricative ɮ

.group  m
        m   m

//MISSING: voiced labiodental nasal ɱ

//MISSING: voiced velar approximant ɰ

.group  n
        n   n

.group  ɲ
        ɲ   J

.group  ŋ
        ŋ   N

.group  ɳ
        ɳ   n`

.group  p
        p   p
        pʰ  p_h

//MISSING: voiceless bilabial implosive ƥ

//MISSING: voiceless bilabial fricative ɸ

.group  q
        q   q

//MISSING: voiceless uvular implosive ʠ

.group  r
        r   r

.group  ɾ
        ɾ   4

//MISSING: voiced alveolar lateral flap ɺ

.group  ɽ
        ɽ   r`

.group  ɹ
        ɹ   r\

//MISSING: voiced retroflex approximant ɻ

.group  R
        R   R\

.group  ʁ
        ʁ   R

.group  s
        s   s

.group  ʂ
        ʂ   s`

.group  ʃ
        ʃ   S

.group  t
        t   t
        ts  ts

//MISSING: voiceless alveolar implosive ƭ

.group  ʈ
        ʈ   t`

.group  θ
        θ   T

.group  v
        v   v

.group  w
        w   w

//MISSING: voiceless labio-velar fricative ʍ

.group  x
        x   x
        
.group  χ
        χ   X

.group  ʎ
        ʎ   L

.group  z
        z   z

.group  ʑ
        ʑ   z\

.group  ʐ
        ʐ   z`

.group  ʔ
        ʔ   ?
        
//MISSING: voiced pharyngeal fricative or approximant ʕ
//MISSING: epiglottal plosive ʡ
//MISSING: voiced epiglottal fricative or approximant ʢ
//MISSING: dental, postalveolar, palatoalveolar, alveolar lateral clicks ǀ ǃ ǂ ǁ

      //********\\
     //Diacritics\\
    //************\\

//Lengthen
.group  ː
    A)  ː   :

//Syllabic consonant
.group  ̩
    C)  ̩   =


      //***\\
     //Other\\
    //*******\\
    
.group
        "   "
        %   %
